Idaho, session 2025, H0159.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 16-1602, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-1602. DEFINITIONS. For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Abused" means any case in which a child has been the victim of:
(a) Conduct or omission resulting in skin bruising, bleeding, mal-
nutrition, burns, fracture of any bone, head injury, soft tissue
swelling, failure to thrive or death, and such condition or death is not
justifiably explained, or where the history given concerning such con-
dition or death is at variance with the degree or type of such condition
or death, or the circumstances indicate that such condition or death may
not be the product of an accidental occurrence; or
(b) Sexual conduct, including rape, molestation, incest, commercial
sexual activity, obscene or pornographic photographing, filming or de-
piction for commercial purposes, human trafficking as defined in chap-
ter 86, title 18, Idaho Code, or other similar forms of sexual exploita-
tion harming or threatening the child's health or welfare or mental in-
jury to the child.
(2) "Abandoned" means the failure of the parent to maintain a normal
parental relationship with his child including, but not limited to, reason-
able support or regular personal contact. Failure to maintain this rela-
tionship without just cause for a period of one (1) year shall constitute
prima facie evidence of abandonment.
(3) "Adaptive equipment" means any piece of equipment or any item that
is used to increase, maintain or improve the parenting capabilities of a par-
ent with a disability.
(4) "Adjudicatory hearing" means a hearing to determine:
(a) Whether the child comes under the jurisdiction of the court pur-
suant to the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Whether continuation of the child in the home would be contrary to
the child's welfare and whether the best interest of the child requires


protective supervision or vesting legal custody of the child in an au-
thorized agency.
(5) "Age of developmentally appropriate" means:
(a) Activities that are generally accepted as suitable for children of
the same chronological age or level of maturity or that are determined
to be developmentally appropriate for a child, based on the development
of cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral capacities that are
typical for an age or age group; and
(b) In the case of a specific child, activities or items that are suit-
able for the child based on the developmental stages attained by the
child with respect to the cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral
capacities of the child.
(6) "Aggravated circumstances" includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Circumstances in which the parent has engaged in any of the follow-
ing:
(i) Abandonment, chronic abuse or chronic neglect of the child.
Chronic neglect or chronic abuse of a child shall consist of abuse
or neglect that is so extreme or repetitious as to indicate that
return of the child to the home would result in unacceptable risk
to the health and welfare of the child.
(ii) Sexual abuse against a child of the parent. Sexual abuse, for
the purposes of this section, includes any conduct described in
section 18-1506, 18-1506A, 18-1507, 18-1508, 18-1508A, 18-6101,
or 18-6604, or chapter 86, title 18, Idaho Code.
(iii) Torture of a child. Any conduct listed in section
18-8303(1), Idaho Code; battery or an injury to a child that re-
sults in serious or great bodily injury to a child; voluntary
manslaughter of a child, or aiding or abetting such voluntary
manslaughter, soliciting such voluntary manslaughter or attempt-
ing or conspiring to commit such voluntary manslaughter;
(b) The parent has committed murder, aided or abetted a murder, so-
licited a murder or attempted or conspired to commit murder; or
(c) The parental rights of the parent to another child have been termi-
nated involuntarily.
(7) "Authorized agency" means the department, a local agency, a person,
an organization, corporation, benevolent society or association licensed
or approved by the department or the court to receive children for control,
care, maintenance or placement.
(8) "Caregiver" means a foster parent with whom a child in foster care
has been placed or a designated official for a child care institution in
which a child in foster care has been placed.
(9) "Case plan hearing" means a hearing to approve, modify or reject the
case plan as provided in section 16-1621, Idaho Code.
(10) "Child" means an individual who is under the age of eighteen (18)
years.
(11) "Child advocacy center" or "CAC" means an organization that ad-
heres to national best practice standards established by the national
membership and accrediting body for children's advocacy centers and that
promotes a comprehensive and coordinated multidisciplinary team response to
allegations of child abuse by maintaining a child-friendly facility at which


appropriate services are provided. These services may include forensic in-
terviews, forensic medical examinations, mental health services and other
related victim services.
(12) "Circumstances of the child" includes, but is not limited to, the
joint legal custody or joint physical custody of the child.
(13) "Commit" means to transfer legal and physical custody.
(14) "Concurrent planning" means a planning model that prepares for and
implements different outcomes at the same time.
(15) "Court" means district court or magistrate division thereof or, if
the context requires, a magistrate or judge thereof.
(16) "Custodian" means a person, other than a parent or legal guardian,
to whom legal or joint legal custody of the child has been given by court or-
der.
(17) "Department" means the department of health and welfare and its au-
thorized representatives.
(18) "Disability" means, with respect to an individual, any mental or
physical impairment that substantially limits one (1) or more major life
activities of the individual including, but not limited to, self-care, man-
ual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, learning or working, or a
record of such an impairment, or being regarded as having such an impairment.
Disability shall not include transvestism, transsexualism, pedophilia,
exhibitionism, voyeurism, other sexual behavior disorders, or substance use
disorders, compulsive gambling, kleptomania or pyromania. Sexual prefer-
ence or orientation is not considered an impairment or disability. Whether
an impairment substantially limits a major life activity shall be determined
without consideration of the effect of corrective or mitigating measures
used to reduce the effects of the impairment.
(19) "Family or household member" shall have the same meaning as in sec-
tion 39-6303(6), Idaho Code.
(20) "Foster care" means twenty-four (24) hour substitute parental care
for children placed away from their parents or guardians by persons who may
or may not be related to the children and for whom the state agency has place-
ment and care responsibility.
(21) "Foster parent" means a person or persons licensed to provide fos-
ter care.
(22) "Grant administrator" means the supreme court or any organization
or agency as may be designated by the supreme court in accordance with such
procedures as may be adopted by the supreme court. The grant administrator
shall administer funds from the guardian ad litem account in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter.
(23) "Guardian ad litem" means a person appointed by the court pursuant
to a guardian ad litem volunteer program to act as special advocate for a
child under this chapter.
(24) "Guardian ad litem coordinator" means a person or entity receiving
moneys from the grant administrator for the purpose of carrying out any of
the duties set forth in section 16-1632, Idaho Code.
(25) "Guardian ad litem program" means the program to recruit, train and
coordinate volunteer persons to serve as guardians ad litem for abused, ne-
glected or abandoned children.


(26) "Homeless," as used in this chapter, shall mean that the child is
without adequate shelter or other living facilities, and the lack of such
shelter or other living facilities poses a threat to the health, safety or
well-being of the child.
(27) "Idaho network of children's advocacy centers" means an organiza-
tion that provides education and technical assistance to child advocacy cen-
ters and to interagency multidisciplinary teams developed pursuant to sec-
tion 16-1617, Idaho Code.
(28) "Law enforcement agency" means a city police department, the pros-
ecuting attorney of any county, state law enforcement officers, or the of-
fice of a sheriff of any county.
(29) "Legal custody" means a relationship created by court order, which
vests in a custodian the following rights and responsibilities:
(a) To have physical custody and control of the child, and to determine
where and with whom the child shall live.
(b) To supply the child with food, clothing, shelter and incidental ne-
cessities.
(c) To provide the child with care, education and discipline.
(d) To authorize ordinary medical, dental, psychiatric, psychologi-
cal, or other remedial care and treatment for the child, including care
and treatment in a facility with a program of services for children, and
to authorize surgery if the surgery is deemed by two (2) physicians li-
censed to practice in this state to be necessary for the child.
(e) Where the parents share legal custody, the custodian may be vested
with the custody previously held by either or both parents.
(30) "Mental injury" means a substantial impairment in the intellectual
or psychological ability of a child to function within a normal range of per-
formance and/or behavior, for short or long terms.
(31) "Neglected" means a child:
(a) Who is without proper parental care and control, or subsistence,
medical or other care or control necessary for his well-being because of
the conduct or omission of his parents, guardian or other custodian or
their neglect or refusal to provide them; however, no child whose parent
or guardian chooses for such child treatment by prayers through spiri-
tual means alone in lieu of medical treatment shall be deemed for that
reason alone to be neglected or lack parental care necessary for his
health and well-being, but this subsection shall not prevent the court
from acting pursuant to section 16-1627, Idaho Code; or
(b) Whose parent, guardian or other custodian is unable to discharge
the responsibilities to and for the child and, as a result of such in-
ability, the child lacks the parental care necessary for his health,
safety or well-being; or
(c) Who has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law; or
(d) Who is without proper education because of the failure to comply
with section 33-202, Idaho Code.
(32) "Order to prevent removal," as described in section 16-1611(5),
Idaho Code, means an order to allow a child to remain in the child's present
surroundings when there is reasonable cause to believe the child is safe in
the sole care of one (1) parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian and when


there is alleged neglect or abuse by another parent, legal guardian, or legal
custodian.
(32) (33) "Permanency hearing" means a hearing to review, approve, re-
ject or modify the permanency plan of the department and to review reasonable
efforts in accomplishing the permanency plan.
(33) (34) "Permanency plan" means a plan for a continuous residence and
maintenance of nurturing relationships during the child's minority.
(34) "Protective order" means an order issued by the court in a child
protection case, prior to the adjudicatory hearing, to enable the child to
remain in the home pursuant to section 16-1615(8), Idaho Code, or follow-
ing an adjudicatory hearing to preserve the unity of the family and to ensure
the best interests of the child pursuant to section 16-1619(10), Idaho Code.
Such an order shall be in the same form and have the same effect as a domes-
tic violence protection order issued pursuant to chapter 63, title 39, Idaho
Code. A protective order shall be for a period not to exceed three (3) months
unless otherwise stated in the order.
(35) "Protective supervision" is a legal status created by court order
in a child protective case whereby the child is in the legal custody of his or
her parent(s), guardian(s) or other legal custodian(s), subject to supervi-
sion by the department.
(36) "Psychotropic medication" means a drug prescribed to affect psy-
chological functioning, perception, behavior or mood. Psychotropic medi-
cations include, but are not limited to, antidepressants, mood stabilizers,
antipsychotics, antianxiety medications, sedatives and stimulants.
(37) "Qualified individual" means a trained professional or licensed
clinician who is not connected to or affiliated with any placement setting
in which children are placed by the department and who is not an employee of
child and family services, unless a waiver has been approved by the autho-
rized agency.
(38) "Qualified residential treatment program" means a program that has
a trauma-informed treatment model designed to address the needs of children
with serious emotional or behavioral disorders or disturbances, is able to
implement the treatment identified for the child by the assessment of the
child required under section 16-1619A(2), Idaho Code, and is licensed and
accredited in accordance with state and federal law.
(39) "Reasonable and prudent parent standard" means the standard of
care characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions that main-
tain the health, safety and best interests of a child while simultaneously
encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child that a care-
giver shall use when determining whether to allow a child in foster care
under the responsibility of the state to participate in extracurricular,
enrichment, cultural or social activities.
(40) "Relative" means a child's grandparent, great grandparent, aunt,
great aunt, uncle, great uncle, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, first
cousin, sibling and half-sibling.
(41) "Residual parental rights and responsibilities" means those
rights and responsibilities remaining with the parents after the transfer of
legal custody including, but not necessarily limited to, the right of visi-
tation, the right to consent to adoption, the right to determine religious


affiliation, the right to family counseling when beneficial, and the respon-
sibility for support.
(42) "Shelter care" means places designated by the department for tem-
porary care of children pending court disposition or placement.
(43) "Supportive services," as used in this chapter, shall mean ser-
vices that assist parents with a disability to compensate for those aspects
of their disability that affect their ability to care for their child and
that will enable them to discharge their parental responsibilities. The
term includes specialized or adapted training, evaluations or assistance
with effectively using adaptive equipment and accommodations that allow
parents with a disability to benefit from other services including, but not
limited to, Braille texts or sign language interpreters.
SECTION 2. That Section 16-1608, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-1608. EMERGENCY REMOVAL. (1)(a) A child may be taken into shelter
care by a peace officer without an order issued pursuant to subsection (4) of
section 16-1611 or section 16-1619, Idaho Code, only where the child is en-
dangered in his surroundings and prompt removal is necessary to prevent se-
rious physical or mental injury to the child or where the child is an aban-
doned child pursuant to the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code.
(b) An alleged offender may be removed from the home of the victim of
abuse or neglect by a peace officer without an order, issued pursuant
to subsection (5) of section 16-1611, Idaho Code, only where the child
is endangered and prompt removal of an alleged offender is necessary to
prevent serious physical or mental injury to the child.
(2) When a child is taken into shelter care under subsection (1) of this
section, he may be held for a maximum of forty-eight (48) hours, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, unless a shelter care hearing has been held
pursuant to section 16-1615, Idaho Code, and the court orders an adjudica-
tory hearing.
(3) When an alleged offender is removed from the home under subsection
(1)(b) of this section, a motion based on a sworn affidavit by the department
must be filed simultaneously with the petition and the court shall determine
at a shelter care hearing, held within a maximum of twenty-four (24) hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, whether the relief sought shall
be granted, pending an adjudicatory hearing. Notice of such hearing shall be
served upon the alleged offender at the time of removal or other protective
relief.
SECTION 3. That Section 16-1611, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-1611. SUMMONS. (1) After a petition has been filed, the clerk of the
court may issue a summons requiring the person or persons who have custody
of the child to bring the child before the court at the adjudicatory hearing
held in accordance with section 16-1619, Idaho Code. Each parent or guardian
shall also be notified in the manner hereinafter provided of the pendency of
the case and the time and place set for the hearing. A summons shall be is-
sued and served requiring the appearance of each parent and legal guardian,


and a summons may be issued and served for any other person whose presence is
required by the child, either of his parents or guardian or any other person
whose presence, in the opinion of the court, is necessary.
(2) A copy of the petition shall be attached to each summons.
(3) The summons shall notify each of the parents, guardian or legal cus-
todian of their right to retain and be represented by counsel. Each parent
or legal guardian of each child named in the petition shall be notified by the
court of the case and of the time and place set for the hearing.
(4) If based on facts presented to the court, it appears that the court
has jurisdiction upon the grounds set forth in section 16-1603, Idaho Code,
and the court finds that the child should be removed from his present condi-
tion or surroundings because continuation in such condition or surroundings
would be contrary to the welfare of the child and vesting legal custody with
the department or other authorized agency would be in the child's best in-
terests, the court shall include on the summons an order to remove the child.
The order to remove the child shall specifically state that continuation in
the present condition or surroundings is contrary to the welfare of the child
and shall require a peace officer or other suitable person to take the child
at once to a place of shelter care designated by the authorized agency which
shall provide shelter care for the child.
(5)(a) If it appears that the child is safe in his present condition
or surroundings and it is not in his best interest to remove him at this
time, the court may issue a protective order based on an affidavit pend-
ing the adjudicatory hearing. If the child is in joint custody, the pro-
tective order shall state with specificity the rights and responsibil-
ities of each parent. Each parent shall be provided with a copy of the
protective order. If there is reasonable cause to believe that a child
would be safe in the child's present surroundings in the sole care of one
(1) parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian and neglect or abuse by
another parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian is alleged, then a
prosecutor or the attorney general may file a motion with the court for
an order to prevent removal of the child that excludes the alleged of-
fending parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian from the residence
where the child resides. If the court finds reasonable cause to believe
that such elements have been demonstrated, the court shall issue an or-
der that shall exclude the alleged offending parent, legal guardian, or
legal custodian from the dwelling where the child resides, restrain any
contact or communication with the child, and restrain the alleged of-
fending parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian from coming within
one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet, or other appropriate distance,
of the child until further order of the court.
(b) A motion filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be
accompanied by a sworn affidavit from a law enforcement officer or the
department.
(c) A copy of an order to prevent removal along with a copy of the peti-
tion and summons shall be served on the alleged offending parent, legal
guardian, or legal custodian, and all parents, legal guardians, or le-
gal custodians shall receive notice of a hearing on whether to continue
an order within forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays.


(d) The court shall continue an order to prevent removal until further
order of the court if, at a hearing on whether to continue the order, the
prosecutor or attorney general shows:
(i) A petition and summons have been issued pursuant to subsec-
tion (1) of this section;
(ii) There is reasonable cause to believe the child is safe in
the child's current surroundings in the sole care of one (1) par-
ent, legal guardian, or legal custodian but has been neglected or
abused by the other parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian;
and
(iii) Continuation of the order is in the child's best interest.
(e) Any person who fails to abide by an order to prevent removal shall
be guilty of misdemeanor criminal contempt, as described in section
18-1801, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. That Section 16-1615, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-1615. SHELTER CARE HEARING. (1) Notwithstanding any other provi-
sion of this chapter, when a child is taken into shelter care pursuant to sec-
tion 16-1608 or 16-1611, Idaho Code, a hearing to determine whether the child
should be released shall be held according to the provisions of this section.
(2) Each of the parents or custodian from whom the child was removed
shall be given notice of the shelter care hearing. Such notice shall include
the time, place, and purpose of the hearing; and, that such person is enti-
tled to be represented by legal counsel. Notice as required by this subsec-
tion shall be given at least twenty-four (24) hours before the shelter care
hearing.
(3) Notice of the shelter care hearing shall be given to the parents or
custodian from whom the child was removed by personal service and the return
of service shall be filed with the court and to any person having joint legal
or physical custody of the subject child. Provided, however, that such ser-
vice need not be made where the undelivered notice is returned to the court
along with an affidavit stating that such parents or custodian could not be
located or were out of the state.
(4) The shelter care hearing may be continued for a reasonable time upon
request by the parent, custodian or counsel for the child.
(5) If, upon the completion of the shelter care hearing, it is shown
that:
(a) A petition has been filed; and
(b) There is reasonable cause to believe the child comes within the ju-
risdiction of the court under this chapter and either:
(i) The department made reasonable efforts to eliminate the need
for shelter care but the efforts were unsuccessful; or
(ii) The department made reasonable efforts to eliminate the need
for shelter care but was not able to safely provide preventive ser-
vices; and
(c) The child could not be placed in the temporary sole custody of a par-
ent having joint legal or physical custody; and
(d) It is contrary to the welfare of the child to remain in the home; and


(e) It is in the best interests of the child to remain in temporary shel-
ter care pending the conclusion of the adjudicatory hearing.
The court shall issue, within twenty-four (24) hours of such hearing, a shel-
ter care order placing the child in the temporary legal custody of the de-
partment or other authorized agency. Any evidence may be considered by the
court which is of the type which reasonable people may rely upon.
(6) Upon finding reasonable cause pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this
section, the court shall order an adjudicatory hearing to be held as soon as
possible, but in no event later than thirty (30) days from the date the peti-
tion was filed. In addition, the court shall inquire whether there is reason
to believe that the child is an Indian child.
(7) Upon entry of an order of shelter care, the court shall inquire:
(a) If the child is of school age, about the department's efforts to
keep the child in the school at which the child is currently enrolled;
and
(b) If a sibling group was removed from their home, about the depart-
ment's efforts to place the siblings together, or if the department has
not placed or will not be placing the siblings together, about a plan
to ensure frequent visitation or ongoing interaction among the sib-
lings, unless visitation or ongoing interaction would be contrary to
the safety or well-being of one (1) or more of the siblings.
(8) If there is reasonable cause to believe that the child comes within
the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter, but a reasonable effort to
prevent placement of the child outside the home could be affected by a pro-
tective order safeguarding the child's welfare, the court may issue, within
twenty-four (24) hours of such hearing, a protective order. Any evidence may
be considered by the court that is of the type which reasonable people may
rely upon.
(9) (8) If the court does not find that the child should be placed in or
remain in shelter care under subsection (5) of this section, the child shall
be released.
(10) (9) If the court does not find reasonable cause pursuant to subsec-
tion (5)(b) of this section, the court shall dismiss the petition.
SECTION 5. That Section 16-1619, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-1619. ADJUDICATORY HEARING -- CONDUCT OF HEARING -- CONSOLIDA-
TION. (1) When a petition has been filed, the court shall set an adjudicatory
hearing to be held no later than thirty (30) days after the filing of the
petition.
(2) A pretrial conference shall be held outside the presence of the
court within three (3) to five (5) days before the adjudicatory hearing.
Investigative reports required under section 16-1616, Idaho Code, shall be
delivered to the court with copies to each of the parents and other legal cus-
todians, guardian ad litem and attorney for the child prior to the pretrial
conference.
(3) At the adjudicatory hearing, parents or guardians with disabil-
ities shall have the right to introduce admissible evidence regarding how
use of adaptive equipment or supportive services may enable the parent or


guardian to carry out the responsibilities of parenting the child by ad-
dressing the reason for the removal of the child.
(4) If a preponderance of the evidence at the adjudicatory hearing
shows that the child comes within the court's jurisdiction under this chap-
ter upon the grounds set forth in section 16-1603, Idaho Code, the court
shall so decree and in its decree shall make a finding on the record of the
facts and conclusions of law upon which it exercises jurisdiction over the
child.
(5) Upon entering its decree, the court shall consider any information
relevant to the disposition of the child but in any event shall:
(a) Place the child under the protective supervision of the department
for an indeterminate period not to exceed the child's eighteenth birth-
day; or
(b) Vest legal custody in the department or other authorized agency
subject to residual parental rights and subject to full judicial re-
view by the court and, when contested by any party, judicial approval
of all matters relating to the custody of the child by the department
or other authorized agency. If the department has placed the child in
a qualified residential treatment program, the court shall approve or
disapprove the placement within sixty (60) days of placement in accor-
dance with section 16-1619A, Idaho Code.
(6) If the court vests legal custody in the department or other autho-
rized agency, the court shall make detailed written findings based on facts
in the record that, in addition to the findings required in subsection (4) of
this section, continuation of residence in the home would be contrary to the
welfare of the child and that vesting legal custody with the department or
other authorized agency would be in the best interests of the child. In ad-
dition, the court shall make detailed written findings based on facts in the
record as to whether the department made reasonable efforts to prevent the
placement of the child in foster care, including findings, when appropriate,
that:
(a) Reasonable efforts were made but were not successful in eliminating
the need for foster care placement of the child;
(b) The department made reasonable efforts to prevent removal but was
not able to safely provide preventive services;
(c) Reasonable efforts to temporarily place the child with related per-
sons were made but were not successful; or
(d) Reasonable efforts to reunify the child with one (1) or both parents
were not required because aggravated circumstances were present. If
aggravated circumstances are found, a permanency hearing for the child
shall be held within thirty (30) days of the determination of aggravated
circumstances.
(7)(a) The court shall also inquire regarding:
(i) Whether there is reason to believe that the child is an Indian
child;
(ii) The efforts that have been made since the last hearing to de-
termine whether the child is an Indian child; and
(iii) The department's efforts to work with all tribes of which the
child may be a member to verify whether the child is a member or el-
igible for membership.


(b) In addition, if the court vests legal custody of the child in the
department or other authorized agency, the court shall inquire as to:
(i) If the child is of school age, the department's efforts to
keep the child in the school at which the child is currently en-
rolled; and
(ii) If a sibling group was removed from the home, the depart-
ment's efforts to place the siblings together, or if the depart-
ment has not placed or will not be placing the siblings together,
about a plan to ensure frequent visitation or ongoing interac-
tion among the siblings, unless visitation or ongoing interaction
would be contrary to the safety or well-being of one (1) or more of
the siblings.
(c) If the court vests legal custody of the child in the department
or other authorized agency and the child is being treated with psy-
chotropic medication, these additional requirements shall apply:
(i) The department shall report to the court the medications and
dosages prescribed for the child and the medical professional who
prescribed the medication; and
(ii) The court shall inquire about and may make any additional in-
quiry relevant to the use of psychotropic medications.
(8) A decree vesting legal custody in the department shall be binding
upon the department and may continue until the child's eighteenth birthday.
(9) A decree vesting legal custody in an authorized agency other than
the department shall be for a period of time not to exceed the child's eigh-
teenth birthday and on such other terms as the court shall state in its decree
to be in the best interests of the child and which the court finds to be ac-
ceptable to such authorized agency.
(10) In order to preserve the unity of the family system and to ensure
the best interests of the child, whether issuing an order of protective su-
pervision or an order of legal custody, the court may consider extending or
initiating a protective order as part of the decree. The protective order
shall be determined as in the best interests of the child and upon a showing
of continuing danger to the child. The conditions and terms of the protec-
tive order shall be clearly stated in the decree.
(11) (10) If the court does not find that the child comes within the ju-
risdiction of this chapter pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, it
shall dismiss the petition.
(12) (11) Where legal custody of a child is vested in the department,
any party or counsel for a child may, at or after the disposition phase of
an adjudicatory hearing, file and serve a written motion to contest matters
relating to the placement of the child by the department. The hearing must
be held no later than thirty (30) days from the date the motion was filed.
If the court approves the placement, the court shall enter an order denying
the motion. If the court does not approve the placement, the court shall en-
ter an order directing the department to identify and implement an alterna-
tive placement in accordance with applicable law. The court shall consider
everything necessary or proper in the best interests of the children. The
court shall consider all relevant factors, which may include:
(a) The wishes of the child regarding the child's custodian;


(b) The wishes of the child's parent or parents regarding the child's
custody, if appropriate;
(c) The interaction and interrelationship of the child with his parent
or parents or foster parent or foster parents, and the child's siblings;
(d) The child's adjustment to his home, school and community;
(e) The character and circumstances of all individuals involved;
(f) The need to promote continuity and stability in the life of the
child; and
(g) A history of domestic violence as defined in section 39-6303, Idaho
Code, whether or not in the presence of the child, or a conviction for
lewd and lascivious conduct or felony injury to a child.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.